Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.716

[Art. 99] Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who before or in the presence of the enemy:

(1) Runs away;

(2) Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is the person's duty to defend;

(3) Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

(4) Casts away arms or ammunition;

(5) Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

(6) Quits a place of duty to plunder or pillage;

(7) Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia;

(8) Wilfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, which it is the person's duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

(9) Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to the state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 66; 1963 c 220 s 98.]